Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.542

Ski & ride Washington license plates.

"Ski & ride Washington license plates" means special license plates displaying a symbol or artwork recognizing the Washington snowsports industry.

[ 2010 c 161 s 143.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.